Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6125.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6bb. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, before entering into a contract for any construction, operations, maintenance, or capital improvement work, an electric utility or natural gas utility shall implement a competitive procurement process for the work. (2) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the commission shall not allow an electric utility or natural gas utility to recover any expenses for a contract for work that was not subject to a competitive procurement process under subsection (1). (3) A bidder or ratepayer may bring a civil action for appropriate injunctive relief, declaratory relief, or damages to enforce compliance with the competitive procurement process under this section. A prevailing plaintiff in an action under this subsection is entitled to recover actual damages or $1,000.00, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney fees and costs. This subsection does not limit any other remedies available under law. (4) All bids to an electric utility or natural gas utility are considered public records. An electric utility or natural gas utility shall make all bids and supporting documentation open to public inspection and copying in accordance with procedures substantially similar to those provided under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (5) As used in sections 6s, 6t, and this section, "competitive procurement process", "competitively bid", or "competitive solicitation" means a bidding or procurement process that is consistent with the requirements for local governments under 2 CFR 200.319, 200.320, and 200.326.